Georgia, session 2025_26, HB623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the Probate Court of Carroll County is hereby authorized to charge and
collect a technology fee to be set by the judge of the probate court in an amount not to
exceed $10.00 for the filing of each civil action with the court. Such technology fees shall
be used exclusively to provide for technological needs of the Probate Court of Carroll
County. Such uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware, software, and accessory purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware;
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of audio-visual, imaging, scanning,
facsimile, communications, recording, projection, and printing equipment and software;
H. B. 623
- 1 -

LC 44 2959/AP
(4) Purchase of local or remote technological support services and equipment which may
be used to connect to cellular radio systems, remote internet services, and any other
remote access system;
(5) Procurement of services and equipment for conserving court records and archiving
the same to digital contents for public access, including but not limited to software,
services, platforms, licensing and user fees for remote or cloud based storage platforms
and cybersecurity services and insurance; and
(6) Technology related training, including courses, certifications, and programs related
to any technology that is specifically utilized for the operation of the court.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the probate court and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this
section.
(c) The authority to assess the technology fee pursuant to this Act shall terminate on
July 1, 2035, and any residual funds remaining in the account established by subsection (b)
of this section shall remain dedicated to general Carroll County technology uses.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 623
- 2 -